test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-namdasj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - намдась: # Verb 'to hear' Type 4-A - partial paradigm
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: намдадмʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: намдан
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: намда
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: намданиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: намдадиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: намдаӈахаʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: намдаваˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: намдадаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: намдаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: намдав
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: намдар
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: намдада
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: намдамиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: намдариʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: намдадиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: намдаваˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: намдараˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: намдадоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: намдӈахаюн
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюд
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюда
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: намдӈахаюниʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: намдӈахаюнаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: намдын
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: намдыд
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: намдыда
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: намдыниʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: намдыдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: намдыдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: намдынаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: намдыдаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: намдыдоʼ 
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: намдадамзь
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: намданась
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: намдась
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: намданинзь
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: намдадинзь
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: намдаӈаханзь
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: намдаваць
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: намдадаць
     намдась+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: намдаць   
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: намдавась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: намдарась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: намдадась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: намдаминзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: намдаринзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: намдадинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: намдаваць
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: намдараць
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: намдадонзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: намдӈахаюнась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: намдӈахаюнинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: намдӈахаюнаць
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдаць
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдонзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: намдынась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: намдыдась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: намдыдась
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: намдынинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: намдыдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: намдыдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: намдынаць
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: намдыдаць
     намдась+V+TV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: намдыдонзь
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1: намдхадмʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: намдхав
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: намдхахаюн
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: намдхан
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1: намдханиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: намдхамиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: намдхахаюниʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: намдханиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: намдхаваˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: намдхахаюнаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: намдханаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2: намдˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: намдад
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: намдхаюнˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: намданˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2: намдадиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: намдариʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: намдыдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2: намдадаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: намдараˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: намдыдаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3: намдая
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: намдамда
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдамда
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: намдыдамда
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3: намдаяхаʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: намдамдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдамдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: намдыдамдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Hort+ScPl1: намдхаваˮ 
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3: намдаяˮ  
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: намдамдоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: намдӈахаюдамдоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: намдыдамдоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: намдъидмʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: намдъин
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: намдъи
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: намдъиниʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: намдъидиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: намдъихиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: намдъиваˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: намдъидаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: намдъиˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: намдъив
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: намдъир
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: намдъида
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: намдъимиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: намдъириʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: намдъидиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: намдъиваˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: намдъираˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: намдъидоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: намдъихиюн
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: намдъихиюд
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: намдъихиюда
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: намдъихиюниʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: намдъихиюдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: намдъихиюдиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: намдъихиюнаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: намдъихиюдаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: намдъихиюдоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: намдъин
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: намдъид
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: намдъида
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: намдъиниʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: намдъидиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: намдъидиʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: намдъинаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: намдъидаˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: намдъидоʼ
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: намдъидамзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: намдъинась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: намдъись
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: намдъининзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: намдъидинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: намдъихинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: намдъиваць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: намдъидаць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: намдъиць      
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: намдъивась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: намдъирась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: намдъидась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: намдъиминзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: намдъиринзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: намдъидинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: намдъиваць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: намдъираць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: намдъидонзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: намдъихиюнась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: намдъихиюдась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: намдъихиюдась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: намдъихиюнинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: намдъихиюдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: намдъихиюдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: намдъихиюнаць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: намдъихиюдаць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: намдъихиюдонзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: намдъинась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: намдъидась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: намдъидась
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: намдъининзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: намдъидинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: намдъидинзь
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: намдъинаць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: намдъидаць
     намдась+V+TV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: намдъидонзь

     намдась+V+TV+InfImprf: намдва  
     намдась+V+TV+InfPrf: намдˮма  
     намдась+V+TV+PrcImprf: [намдана, намдна]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf: намдвы
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut: [намдавнда, намдувнда]   
     намдась+V+TV+PrcNeg: [намдавдавэй, намдувдавэй]
     намдась+V+TV+Ger: [намда, намдась]
     намдась+V+TV+GerFin: намдванзь      
     намдась+V+TV+Subord+Abs: намдабˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Evas+Abs: намдвоӈгад
     намдась+V+TV+ConNeg: намдˮ
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: [намдӈгуˮ, намдаӈгуˮ]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [намдаӈгудмʼ, намдӈгудмʼ]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: [намдаӈгун, намдӈгун]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [намдаӈгу, намдӈгу]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: [намдаӈгуниʼ, намдӈгуниʼ]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [намдаӈгудиʼ, намдӈгудиʼ]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [намдаӈгухуʼ, намдӈгухуʼ]   
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: [намдаӈгуваˮ, намдӈгуваˮ]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [намдаӈгудаˮ, намдӈгудаˮ]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [намдаӈгуˮ, намдӈгуˮ]
